Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2526
Occupational therapist; services authorized.

(1) An occupational therapist may perform any services identified in section 38-2510 for which the occupational therapist is competent to perform based on the occupational therapist's entry-level training or continued professional development. An occupational therapist may pursue specialization, training, or professional development in a specific modality, procedure, or technique. It is the responsibility of the practitioner to be proficient and document proficiency in the specific modality of practice.

(2) An occupational therapist is qualified to apply physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities pursuant to subsection (1) of section 38-2530.

(3) An occupational therapist may complete insertion and removal of cannulas for oxygen and adjustment of the rate of flow based on a physician order.

(4) An occupational therapist shall not independently diagnose a medical condition or disease.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 124;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6118;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 866;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 16.